Utah statutes.
76-7-309.   Pathologist's report.

Any human tissue removed during an abortion shall be submitted to a pathologist who shall make a report, including, but not limited to whether there was a pregnancy, and if possible, whether the pregnancy was aborted by evacuating the uterus.

